Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 452.11 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma House of Representatives and the Oklahoma State
Senate shall develop and implement a system for purposes of the
drafting and consideration of any measure or any amendment to a
measure presented for any vote during the legislative process that
meets the requirements of subsection B of this section.
B. If the measure or proposed amendment to a measure contains a
reference to any Oklahoma statute the text of which does not appear
in the measure or the amendment to a measure, a hyperlink or
Req. No. 11291 Page 1

equi valent technology shall be inserted into the measure to allow a
reader of the measure or amendment to a measure to activate the
hyperlink or equivalent connective technology in order to provide
access to the entire text of the statute.
C. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to all
versions of a measure except the enrolled version.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-1-11291 MAH 01/15/25















Req. No. 11291 Page 2